sl-SI: Oblika hrastovega izdelka: Izbor/mešanica; Čips; Kocke; Prah; Spirale; Dogice; Drugo
hu: Tölgyből készült termék formája: Válogatás / keverék; Forgács; Kocka; Por; Spirál; Donga; Egyéb
vi: Hình thức sản phẩm làm từ gỗ sồi: Hỗn hợp/pha trộn; Dăm; Khối; Bột; Dạng xoắn; Dạng thanh; Khác
ko: 오크 제품 형태: 모음/블렌드; 칩; 큐브; 분말; 스파이럴; 스테이브; 기타
pl: Forma produktu dębowego: Asortyment/mieszanka; Płatki; Kostki; Proszek; Spirale; Klepki; Inne
th: รูปแบบผลิตภัณฑ์จากไม้โอ๊ค: คละแบบ/ผสม; แผ่นไม้; ลูกบาศก์; ผง; เกลียว; ไม้ระแนง; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 橡木产品形态: 什锦/混合; 木屑; 木块; 粉末; 螺旋状; 板条; 其他
da: Egeproduktform: Sortiment/blanding; Spåner; Terninger; Pulver; Spiraler; Stave; Andet
el: Μορφή προϊόντος από δρυ: Ποικιλία/χαρμάνι; Ροκανίδια; Κύβοι; Σκόνη; Σπιράλ; Δούγες; Άλλο
de: Produktform des Eichenholzes: Mischung/Blend; Chips; Würfel; Pulver; Spiralen; Dauben; Andere
fr: Formulaire de commande de produits en chêne: Assortiment/mélange; Copeaux; Cubes; Poudre; Spirales; Douelles; Autre
tr: Meşe ürün formu: Çeşit/karışım; Cips; Küp; Toz; Spiral; Fıçı tahtası; Diğer
pt-BR: Forma do produto em carvalho: Variedade/blend; Lascas; Cubos; Pó; Espirais; Aduelas; Outro
lt-LT: Ąžuolinio gaminio forma: Asorti / mišinys; Drožlės; Kubeliai; Milteliai; Spiralės; Šulai; Kita
zh-TW: 橡木商品形式: 綜合/混合; 橡木片; 橡木塊; 橡木粉; 橡木螺旋; 橡木條; 其他
it: Forma del prodotto di quercia: Assortimento/miscela; Trucioli; Cubi; Polvere; Spirali; Doghe; Altro
ro-RO: Formă a produsului din stejar: Asortiment/amestec; Așchii; Cuburi; Pudră; Spirale; Doage; Altele
es: Forma del producto de roble: Surtido/mezcla; Astillas; Cubos; Polvo; Espirales; Duelas; Otro
hr-HR: Oblik proizvoda od hrasta: Asortiman/mješavina; Iverje; Kockice; Prah; Spirale; Duge; Ostalo
sk-SK: Forma produktu z dubového dreva: Zmes; Lupienky; Kocky; Prášok; Špirály; Dúžky; Iné
nl: Productform eikenhout: Assortiment/mix; Snippers; Blokjes; Poeder; Spiralen; Duigen; Overig
cs: Forma pro výrobky z dubového dřeva: Směs; Chipsy; Kostky; Prášek; Spirály; Dužiny; Ostatní
ru: Форма продукта из дуба: Ассорти / смесь; Щепа; Кубики; Порошок; Спирали; Клепки; Другое
ja: オーク商品フォーム: 詰め合わせ/ブレンド; チップ; キューブ; パウダー; スパイラル; スティーブ; その他
en: Oak product form: Assortment/blend; Chips; Cubes; Powder; Spirals; Staves; Other
pt-PT: Forma do produto de carvalho: Sortido/mistura; Lascas; Cubos; Pó; Espirais; Aduelas; Outro
nb: Format for eikeprodukt: Utvalg/blanding; Flis; Terninger; Pulver; Spiraler; Staver; Annet
fi: Tammituotteen muoto: Lajitelma/sekoitus; Lastut; Kuutiot; Jauhe; Spiraalit; Sauvat; Muu
bg-BG: Форма на дъбовия продукт: Асортимент/микс; Чипс; Кубчета; Прах; Спирали; Дъги за бъчви; Друго
sv: Produktform för ek: Sortiment/blandning; Flis; Kuber; Pulver; Spiraler; Stavar; Övrigt